Colorado, session 2026A, HB1153.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of education for
the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado
2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part IV as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART IV
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(1) MANAGEMENT AND ADMINISTRATION
(A) Administration and Centrally-Appropriated Line Items
State Board of Education 591,597 591,597
(2.5 FTE)
General Department and
Program Administration 7,130,010 3,398,673 189,578a 3,541,759b
(24.2 FTE) (2.1 FTE) (19.9 FTE)
Grants Administration 593,016 438,355 154,661c
(0.3 FTE) (0.2 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 10,185,306 4,245,500 1,621,444d 962,909e 3,355,453(I)
10,109,661 4,029,691 1,639,924d 990,042e 3,450,004(I)
Short-term Disability 43,788 17,808 6,486d 4,657e 14,837(I)
Paid Family Medical Leave
Insurance 281,513 113,206 42,985d 29,940e 95,382(I)
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement 6,255,840 2,501,587 969,318d 665,340e 2,119,595(I)
Salary Survey 1,659,158 649,333 251,468d 182,709e 575,648(I)
Step Pay 377,596 144,466 57,000d 37,338e 138,792(I)
PERA Direct Distribution 1,293,177 957,714 197,927d 137,536e
Workers' Compensation 312,534 150,161 40,784d 10,562e 111,027(I)
Legal Services 1,194,782 738,375 400,252d 56,155e
Administrative Law Judge
Services 251,414 251,414f
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 1,024,799 1,024,799
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 1,288,751 367,293 234,554d 117,276g 569,628(I)
CORE Operations 53,850 26,922 20,862h 6,066i
32,537,131
32,461,486
a This amount shall be from general education development program fees.
b Of this amount, $2,471,912 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., and $1,069,847
shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $79,328 shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution, $40,262 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund
created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., $27,096 shall be from the Early Literacy Fund created in Section 22-7-1210 (1), C.R.S. $4,459 shall be from the Public School Capital
Construction Assistance Fund created in Section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S., and $3,516 shall be from the Start Smart Nutrition Program Fund created in Section 22-82.7-105 (1), C.R.S.
Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section
20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
d Of these amounts, $1,230,823 $1,237,594 shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution, $1,054,108(I) $1,057,817(I) shall
be from the Educator Licensure Cash Fund created in Section 22-60.5-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., $605,350 $609,295 shall be from the Public School Capital Construction Assistance Fund
created in Section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S., $476,800 $478,943 shall be from the Early Literacy Fund created in Section 22-7-1210 (1), C.R.S., $187,570 $188,594 shall be from the
Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., $50,090 shall be from the Healthy School Meals for All Program Cash Fund created in Section 22-82.9-211 (2),
C.R.S., $44,831 $45,078 shall be from general education development program fees, and $172,646 $173,287 shall be from various sources of cash funds. Pursuant to Section 17 (3)
of Article IX of the State Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the
State Constitution.
e Of these amounts, $1,833,903 $1,861,036 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.,
$56,155 is estimated to be transferred from the Division of Public School Capital Construction Assistance line item appropriation in the School District Operations section of this
department, $26,405 is estimated to be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing from the Transfer to the Department of Education
for Public School Health Services Administration line item in the Executive Director's Office, $22,779 is estimated to be transferred from the Department of Regulatory Agencies from
the Reading Services for the Blind Cash Fund and Disabled Telephone Users Fund in the Public Utilities Commission, and $147,904 shall be from various sources of reappropriated
funds.
f Of this amount, $207,288(I) shall be from the Educator Licensure Cash Fund created in Section 22-60.5-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., and $44,126 shall be from the State Education Fund created
in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject
to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
g This amount shall be transferred from the Division of Public School Capital Construction Assistance line item appropriation in the School District Operations section of this department.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
h Of this amount, it is estimated that $7,801 shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution, $4,993(I) shall be from the Educator
Licensure Cash Fund created in Section 22-60.5-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., $3,604 shall be from the Public School Capital Construction Assistance Fund created in Section 22-43.7-104 (1),
C.R.S., $2,852 shall be from the Early Literacy Fund created in Section 22-7-1210 (1), C.R.S., $1,300 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1),
C.R.S., and $312 shall be from general education development program fees. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution, appropriations from the State Education
Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
i This amount shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
(B) Information Technology
Information Technology
Services 6,165,688 5,406,803 223,161a 535,724b
(29.0 FTE) (0.5 FTE) (6.9 FTE)
Payments to OIT 1,030,649 760,778 204,391c 65,480d
954,117 704,286 189,214c 60,617d
Information Technology
Asset Maintenance 969,147 969,147
Disaster Recovery 19,722 19,722
8,185,206
8,108,674
a This amount shall be from the Statewide Longitudinal Data System Cash Fund created in Section 24-37.5-125 (8), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be transferred from various federal funds appropriations to the Department of Education.
c Of this amount, it is estimated that $74,515 $68,982 shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution, $39,887(I) $36,925(I)
shall be from the Educator Licensure Cash Fund created in Section 22-60.5-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., $34,124 $31,590 shall be from the Early Literacy Fund created in Section 22-7-1210
(1), C.R.S., $28,796 $26,658 shall be from the Public School Capital Construction Assistance Fund created in Section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S., $22,787 $21,095 shall be from the
Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., $2,502 $2,316 shall be from general education development program fees, and $1,780 $1,648 shall be from various
sources of cash funds. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year
spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
d This amount shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(C) Special Purpose
BOCES Funding per
Section 22-5-122, C.R.S. 3,327,275 3,327,275a
(1.0 FTE)
Interstate Compact on
Educational Opportunity
for Military Children 21,298 21,298a
Reprinting and Distributing
Laws Concerning
Education 35,480 35,480b
3,384,053
a These amounts shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State
Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b This amount shall be from interest and income earned on the investment of money in the Public School Fund that is credited to the State Public School Fund pursuant to Section
22-41-102 (3)(g), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 22-2-112 (1)(i), C.R.S., publishing costs shall be paid out of State Public School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S.
(D) Indirect Cost Assessment
Indirect Cost Assessment 967,042 591,523(I)a 375,519(I)
a This amount shall be from the Educator Licensure Cash Fund created in Section 22-60.5-112 (1)(a), C.R.S.
45,073,432
44,921,255
(2) STATEWIDE ASSESSMENT PROGRAM
Statewide Assessment
Program 33,447,220 25,635,138a 7,812,082(I)b
(4.0 FTE) (15.9 FTE)
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a This amount shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution,
appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b This amount shall be from the federal grant for state assessments and related activities authorized pursuant to Title VI, Part A, Section 6113 of the federal No Child Left Behind Act
of 2001, and is shown for informational purposes only.
(3) SCHOOL DISTRICT OPERATIONS
(A) Public School Finance
Administration 2,471,809 2,210,618 261,191a
(16.0 FTE) (1.5 FTE)
Financial Transparency
System Maintenance 92,786 92,786a
(1.0 FTE)
School Finance Audit
Payments 3,000,000 3,000,000b
State Share of Districts'
Total Program Funding10 5,463,908,610 3,095,718,552 1,292,968,309c 1,075,221,749d
Extended High School11 24,559,880 24,559,880a
District Per Pupil
Reimbursements for
Juveniles Held in Jail 10,000 10,000b
At-risk Per Pupil
Additional Funding 5,000,000 5,000,000a
Contingency Reserve Fund 1,000,000 1,000,000e
5,500,043,085
a These amounts shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State
Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b These amounts shall be from the State Public School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S., from federal mineral leasing revenues transferred to the State Public School Fund
pursuant to Sections 22-54-114 (1) and 34-63-102, C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
d Of this amount, $1,004,554,817 shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution and $70,666,932 shall be from the State Public
School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject
to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution. Of the amount appropriated from the State Public School Fund, $51,922,059 is
estimated to be from federal mineral leasing revenues transferred to the State Public School Fund pursuant to Sections 22-54-114 (1) and 34-63-102, C.R.S., $16,217,517 is estimated
to be from marijuana sales tax revenues transferred to the State Public School Fund pursuant to Section 39-28.8-203 (1)(b)(I.5)(B), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section
22-54-139, C.R.S., and $2,527,356 is estimated to be from interest and income earned on the investment of money in the Public School Fund that is credited to the State Public School
Fund pursuant to Section 22-41-102 (3)(f), C.R.S.
e This amount shall be from the Contingency Reserve Fund created in Section 22-54-117 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(B) Categorical Programs
(1) District Programs Required by Statute
Special Education
Programs for Children with
Disabilities 591,135,231 93,572,347 295,122,451a 191,090b 202,249,343(I)c
(1.0 FTE) (99.0 FTE)
English Language
Proficiency Program 47,603,560 3,101,598 32,764,666a 11,737,296(I)d
(4.6 FTE)
638,738,791
a These amounts shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State
Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b This amount shall be from federal funds transferred from the Department of Human Services.
c This amount shall be from federal funds authorized pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.
d This amount shall be from federal funds authorized pursuant to Title III of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001.
(2) Other Categorical Programs
Public School
Transportation 73,461,986 36,922,227 36,501,594a 38,165b
(2.0 FTE)
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Transfer to the Department
of Higher Education for
Distribution of State
Assistance for Career and
Technical Education 32,689,057 17,792,850 14,896,207c
Special Education
Programs for Gifted and
Talented Children 16,793,762 5,500,000 11,293,762c
(1.5 FTE)
Expelled and At-risk
Student Services Grant
Program 9,473,039 5,788,807 3,684,232c
(1.0 FTE)
Small Attendance Center
Aid 1,606,548 787,645 818,903c
Comprehensive Health
Education 1,115,829 300,000 815,829c
(1.0 FTE)
135,140,221
a Of this amount, $36,051,594 shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution and $450,000 shall be from the Public School
Transportation Fund created in Section 22-51-103 (1), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not
subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Public Health and Environment, from the Electrifying School Buses Grant Program Cash Fund created in section 25-7-1405
(1)(a), C.R.S.
c These amounts shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State
Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(C) Federal and Other Direct Support
Appropriated Sponsored
Programs 260,503,302 7,503,302a 253,000,000(I)
(2.5 FTE) (58.8 FTE)
a Of this amount, $5,000,000(I) shall be from custodial funds received from Department of Law, and $2,503,302 shall be from various grants and donations.
(D) Nutrition
(1) Healthy School Meals for All Program
Program Administration 436,824 436,824a
468,824 468,824a
(3.2 FTE)
School Meal
Reimbursements 150,522,940 42,240,242 108,282,698a
150,959,764
150,991,764
a These amounts shall be from the Healthy School Meals for All Program Cash Fund, created in Section 22-82.9-211 (2), C.R.S.
(2) Other Nutrition Program
Federal Nutrition Programs 338,222,699 111,060 338,111,639(I)
(0.9 FTE) (16.1 FTE)
State Match for School
Lunch Program 2,472,644 2,472,644a
Child Nutrition School
Lunch Protection Program 841,460 841,460b
Start Smart Nutrition
Program 296,484 296,484c
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Summer Electronics
Benefits Transfer for
Children 447,902 223,935 223,967(I)
(0.9 FTE) (0.8 FTE)
342,281,189
a This amount shall be from the State Public School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S., from interest and income earned on the investment of money in the Public School
Fund that is credited to the State Public School Fund pursuant to Section 22-41-102 (3)(g), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution,
appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
c This amount shall be from the Start Smart Nutrition Program Fund created in Section 22-82.7-105 (1), C.R.S.
(E) Public School Capital Construction
Division of Public School
Capital Construction
Assistance 1,877,508 1,877,508a
(16.0 FTE)
Public School Capital
Construction Assistance
Board - Lease Payments 125,000,000 125,000,000b
Public School Capital
Construction Assistance
Board - Cash Grants12 157,075,447 157,075,447a
Financial Assistance
Priority Assessment 150,000 150,000a
State Aid for Charter
School Facilities 42,280,571 42,280,571c
326,383,526
a These amounts shall be from the Public School Capital Construction Assistance Fund created in Section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b This amount shall be from the Public School Capital Construction Assistance Fund created in Section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S. Of this amount $62,500,000 shall be from matching money
paid to the state by entities that use the facilities that have been financed, pursuant to Sections 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(IV) and 22-43.7-110 (2)(c), C.R.S., and $62,500,000 shall be from
other money credited to the fund pursuant to Section 22-43.7-104 (2), C.R.S., and excludes matching money paid to the state pursuant to Section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(IV), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $23,523,071 shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution, $12,000,000 shall be from the Charter School
Facilities Assistance Account pursuant to Section 22-43.7-104 (2)(d)(II), C.R.S., and $6,757,500 shall be from the Charter School Facilities Assistance Account pursuant to Section
22-43.7-104 (2)(d)(I), C.R.S. The Charter School Facilities Assistance Account is created in Section 22-43.7-104 (2)(d)(I) as an account within the Public School Capital Construction
Assistance Fund. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending
set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
(F) Indirect Cost Assessment
Indirect Cost Assessment 3,967,960 25,000a 128,142b 3,814,818(I)
a This amount shall be from various grants and donations.
b This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing from the Education subdivision of the Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded
Programs division.
7,358,017,838
7,358,049,838
(4) EDUCATOR TALENT
Office of Professional
Services 3,706,445 804,147 2,902,298(I)a
(5.0 FTE) (22.2 FTE)
Educator Effectiveness
Unit Administration 3,638,702 3,484,391 154,311b
(17.2 FTE) (1.0 FTE)
Quality Teacher
Recruitment Program 3,000,000 3,000,000
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Educator Recruitment and
Retention Program -
Financial Assistance 5,000,000 5,000,000
School Leadership Pilot
Program 250,000 250,000
(1.2 FTE)
Teacher Degree
Apprenticeship Program 103,949 103,949
(1.0 FTE)
15,699,096
a This amount shall be from the Educator Licensure Cash Fund created in Section 22-60.5-112 (1)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution,
appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
(5) STUDENT LEARNING
(A) Learning Supports, Intervention, and Planning
Preschool to Postsecondary
Education Alignment 779,088 39,025 740,063a
(0.5 FTE) (3.5 FTE)
Content Specialists 714,261 144,648 569,613a
(0.2 FTE) (5.0 FTE)
School Bullying Prevention
and Education Cash Fund 1,000,000 1,000,000
English Language Learners
Technical Assistance 456,302 394,205 62,097a
(4.5 FTE) (0.5 FTE)
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Working Group for
Identification of and
Educational Support for
Students with Dyslexia 40,616 40,616
Parents Encouraging
Parents Conferences 68,000 68,000
Restraint Complaint 122,501 122,501
(1.0 FTE)
School Climate 107,615 107,615
(1.0 FTE)
Legal Representation for
Due Process Complaints
Pursuant to Section
22-20-108 (3), C.R.S. 20,000 20,000
Math Educator Training
and Improvement Planning 482,373 482,373
(3.5 FTE)
Expulsion Hearing Officer
Training and Support 117,645 117,645
(1.0 FTE)
Abbreviated School Day
Training and Assistance 115,714 115,714
(1.0 FTE)
IEP Training Program 91,707 91,707
(0.5 FTE)
4,115,822
a These amounts shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State
Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Early Literacy
Early Literacy Program
Administration and
Technical Support13 1,930,481 1,930,481a
(9.3 FTE)
Early Literacy Competitive
Grant Program13 7,500,000 7,500,000a
Early Literacy Program
Evidence Based Training
Provided to Teachers13 2,784,277 2,784,277a
(3.5 FTE)
READ Act Targeted
Training Initiative14 3,361,590 3,361,590a
(2.0 FTE)
Early Literacy Program
External Evaluation 750,000 750,000a
Early Literacy Program
Public Information
Campaign 505,240 505,240a
(0.5 FTE)
Early Literacy Program Per
Pupil Intervention
Program13 26,261,551 26,261,551a
Early Literacy Assessment
Tool Program 2,997,072 2,997,072b
46,090,211
a These amounts shall be from the Early Literacy Fund created in Section 22-7-1210 (1), C.R.S., from money transferred from the State Education Fund pursuant to Section 22-7-1210
(1)(d)(I), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution,
appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(C) Facility Schools
Facility Schools Office,
Facility School Board, and
Facility School Technical
Assistance Center 894,607 894,607a
(8.6 FTE)
State School Funding 1,925,110 1,925,110a
Facility School Funding 33,343,020 33,343,020a
Facility Schools Work
Group and Program
Evaluation Contracts 200,000 200,000a
36,362,737
a These amounts shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State
Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
86,568,770
(6) SCHOOL QUALITY AND SUPPORT
(A) Accountability and Transformation
Longitudinal Analyses of
Student Assessment Results 715,780 715,780
(5.1 FTE)
Accountability and
Improvement Planning 2,425,700 1,360,431 1,065,269(I)
(5.1 FTE) (10.0 FTE)
Local Accountability
System Grant Program 498,346 498,346
(0.4 FTE)
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
School Transformation
Grant Program 8,121,243 6,102,141 2,019,102a
(2.8 FTE) (1.2 FTE)
Federal School
Transformation
Administration and Support 769,725 769,725(I)
(4.2 FTE)
Educator Perception 83,500 83,500
12,614,294
a This amount shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution,
appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
(B) Schools of Choice
Schools of Choice 10,704,219 377,719 10,326,500(I)
(2.8 FTE) (4.0 FTE)
Supplemental On-line
Education Services 1,220,000 1,220,000a
Office of Online and
Hybrid Learning and
Innovation Schools 564,576 48,677 515,899b
(0.5 FTE) (4.3 FTE)
12,488,795
a This amount shall be from the State Public School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S., from federal mineral leasing revenues transferred to the State Public School Fund
pursuant to Sections 22-54-114 (1) and 34-63-102, C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution,
appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
25,103,089
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(7) STUDENT PATHWAYS
(A) Health and Wellness
S.B. 97-101 Public School
Health Services 188,112 188,112a
(1.4 FTE)
Behavioral Health Care
Professional Matching
Grant Program 14,984,818 14,984,818b
(5.0 FTE)
Mental Health Education
Resource Bank and
Technical Assistance 51,321 51,321
(0.6 FTE)
S.B. 24-048 Substance use
Disorders Recovery Grant
Pilot Program 25,011 25,011
(0.2 FTE)
Menstrual Hygiene Product
Accessibility Grant
Program 100,000 100,000
(0.2 FTE)
15,349,262
a This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing from the Education subdivision of the Transfers to Other State
Department Medicaid-Funded Programs division.
b This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Office of Dropout Prevention and Student Reengagement
Dropout Prevention 2,005,329 2,005,329a
(1.0 FTE)
Ninth Grade Success Grant
Program 2,007,458 2,007,458b
(1.4 FTE)
H.B. 22-1374 Support for
Foster Care Students 72,316 72,316
(0.6 FTE)
Educational Stability Grant 1,035,679 1,035,679
(3.0 FTE)
H.B. 24-1216 Supports for
Youth in Juvenile Justice
System 92,362 92,362
(0.8 FTE)
H.B. 24-1331
Out-of-School Time Grant
Program 3,461,979 3,461,979
(1.4 FTE)
H.B. 24-1403 Homeless
Student Scholarship
Program 26,632 26,632
(0.2 FTE)
8,701,755
a This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution,
appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(C) Career Readiness
Career Development
Success Program15 9,521,670 9,521,670
(1.1 FTE)
College and Career
Readiness 369,125 369,125
(3.2 FTE)
Concurrent Enrollment
Expansion and Innovation
Grant Program 1,476,948 1,476,948a
School Counselor Corps
Grant Program 12,029,506 12,029,506b
(2.0 FTE)
Fourth-year Innovation
Pilot Program -
Distributions to LEPs 386,659 386,659
John W. Buckner
Automatic Enrollment in
Advanced Courses Grant
Program 247,914 247,914
(0.3 FTE)
Basic Skills Placement or
Assessment Tests 50,000 50,000b
Federal Adult Education
Support 9,193,475 9,193,475(I)
(8.9 FTE)
Adult Education and
Literacy Grant Program 2,965,365 2,965,365
(2.3 FTE)
36,240,662
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State
Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
60,291,679
(8) LIBRARY PROGRAMS
Administration 1,320,400 1,052,987 267,413a
(11.8 FTE) (2.5 FTE)
Federal Library Funding 3,544,534 3,544,534(I)
(24.8 FTE)
Colorado Library
Consortium 1,150,000 1,150,000
Colorado Virtual Library 379,796 359,796 20,000a
Colorado Talking Book
Library 354,001 96,146 257,855b
(2.7 FTE)
Reading Services for the
Blind16 860,000 250,000 610,000c
State Grants to
Publicly-Supported
Libraries Program 2,997,485 2,997,485
Indirect Cost Assessment 55,327 55,327(I)
10,661,543
a These amounts shall be from grants and donations.
b This amount shall be from money appropriated from the Colorado Telephone Users with Disabilities Fund to the Department of Regulatory Agencies for the Colorado Talking Book
Library, pursuant to Section 40-17-104 (1)(b)(III), C.R.S.
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
c This amount shall be from money appropriated from the Colorado Telephone Users with Disabilities Fund to the Department of Regulatory Agencies, to be credited to the Reading
Services for the Blind Cash Fund created in Section 24-90-105.5 (5), C.R.S., pursuant to Section 40-17-104 (1)(b)(II), C.R.S.
(9) SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF AND THE BLIND
(A) School Operations
Personal Services 14,635,354
(156.1 FTE)
Early Intervention Services 1,446,524
(10.0 FTE)
Shift Differential 75,298
Operating Expenses 694,291
Vehicle Lease Payments 45,211
39,333
Utilities 745,981
Allocation of State and
Federal Categorical
Program Funding 191,920
(0.4 FTE)
Medicaid Reimbursements
for Public School Health
Services 450,776
(2.0 FTE)
18,285,355 15,780,872 2,504,483a
18,279,477 15,774,994
a Of this amount, $1,826,787 shall be transferred from the State School Funding line item appropriation in the Student Learning section of this department, $450,776 shall be transferred
from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing from the Education subdivision of the Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs division, $191,920
shall be transferred from various line items in the School District Operations section of this department, and $35,000 shall be transferred from the Appropriated Sponsored Programs
line item appropriation in the School District Operations section of this department.
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Special Purpose
Fees and Conferences 120,000
Outreach Services 1,000,000
(6.2 FTE)
Tuition from Out-of-state
Students 200,000
Grants 1,000,000
(6.0 FTE)
2,320,000 1,070,000a 1,250,000b
a Of this amount, $750,000 shall be from fees collected from school districts, boards of cooperative services, and private entities for the purposes of outreach services, $200,000 shall
be from tuition payments received from other states, and $120,000 shall be from fees and charges for workshops and conferences.
b This amount shall be from various sources of federal funds transferred from the School District Operations section of this department.
20,605,355
20,599,477
(10) CHARTER SCHOOL INSTITUTE
State Charter School
Institute Administration,
Oversight, and
Management 5,000,000 5,000,000(I)a
(11.7 FTE)
Institute Charter School
Assistance Fund 1,800,000 1,800,000b
Other Transfers to Institute
Charter Schools 21,500,000 21,500,000(I)c
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Transfer of Federal Money
to Institute Charter Schools 17,400,000 17,400,000(I)c
(4.5 FTE)
CSI Mill Levy Equalization 54,592,279 27,220,696 27,371,583d
55,626,394 28,405,698d
Department
Implementation of Section
22-30.5-501 et seq., C.R.S. 243,362 243,362a
(1.6 FTE)
100,535,641
101,569,756
a These amounts shall be transferred from the State Share of Districts' Total Program Funding line item appropriation in the School District Operations section of this department.
b This amount shall be from the Institute Charter School Assistance Fund created in Section 22-30.5-515.5 (1)(a), C.R.S.
c These amounts shall be transferred from various line items in the School District Operations section of this department.
d This amount shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State
Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
TOTALS PART IV
(EDUCATION) $7,756,003,663 $3,418,629,265 $1,292,968,309a $2,139,481,573b $55,664,660c $849,259,856d
$7,756,911,723 $3,418,351,086 $2,140,550,991b $55,686,930c $849,354,407d
a This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $9,800,097 $9,800,844 contains an (I) notation.
c Of this amount, $43,900,000 contains an (I) notation.
d This amount contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 23-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
10 Department of Education, School District Operations, Public School Finance, State Share of Districts' Total Program Funding -- It is the General Assembly's
intent that a portion of the amount appropriated for this line item, not to exceed $200,000 for the 2025-26 state fiscal year, shall be transferred to the Legislative
Council for the purpose of funding the biennial cost of living analysis pursuant to Section 22-54-104 (5)(c)(III)(B), C.R.S.
11 Department of Education, School District Operations, Public School Finance, Extended High School -- Pursuant to section 22-35-108.5 (2)(b)(II), C.R.S.,
the purpose of this footnote is to specify what portion of this appropriation is intended to be available for the Teacher Recruitment Education and Preparation
(TREP) Program for the 2025-26 state fiscal year. It is the General Assembly's intent that the Department of Education be authorized to utilize up to $2,620,000
of this appropriation to fund qualified students identified as TREP Program participants. This amount is calculated based on an estimated 250 FTE TREP
Program participants funded at a rate of $10,480 per FTE pursuant to section 22-54-204 (4.7), C.R.S.
12 Department of Education, School District Operations, Public School Capital Construction, Public School Capital Construction Assistance Board - Cash Grants
-- This appropriation remains available until the completion of the project or the close of the 2027-28 state fiscal year, whichever comes first.
13 Department of Education, Student Learning, Early Literacy, Early Literacy Program Administration and Technical Support; Early Literacy Competitive Grant
Program; Early Literacy Program Evidence Based Training Provided to Teachers; Early Literacy Program Per Pupil Intervention Program -- In addition to
the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the Department is authorized to transfer up to $1,500,000 cash funds from the Early Literacy
Fund created in Section 22-7-1210 (1), C.R.S., among the line items designated with this footnote, except that the amount for Early Literacy Program
Administration and Technical Support may be increased by no more than ten percent based on an assumption that the Department may require an additional
2.0 FTE.
14 Department of Education, Student Learning, Early Literacy, READ Act Targeted Training Initiative -- This appropriation remains available until the close
of the 2026-27 state fiscal year.
15 Department of Education, Student Pathways, Career Readiness, Career Development Success Program -- It is the General Assembly's intent that $200,000
of this appropriation be used for activities other than direct grants to school districts.
16 Department of Education, Library Programs, Reading Services for the Blind -- This appropriation is for the support of privately operated reading services for
the blind, as authorized by section 24-90-105.5, C.R.S. It is the General Assembly's intent that $615,000 of this appropriation be used to provide access to
radio and television broadcasts of locally published and produced materials and $245,000 of this appropriation be used to provide telephone access to digital
transmissions of nationally published and produced materials.
PAGE 24-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

SECTION 2. Appropriation to the department of education
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado
2025, section 20 of chapter 235, (HB 25-1278), amend (3) as follows:
Section 20. Appropriation - adjustments to 2025 long bill.
(3) For the 2025-26 state fiscal year, $559,187 is appropriated to the
department of education for use by school quality and support. This
appropriation is from the general fund and is based on an assumption that
the division will require an additional 3.4 FTE. To implement this act, the
division may use this appropriation for accountability and improvement
planning. OF THIS APPROPRIATION, UP TO $485,910, IF NOT EXPENDED
PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, IS FURTHER APPROPRIATED TO THE DEPARTMENT
FOR THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR FOR THE SAME PURPOSE.
SECTION 3. Appropriation to the department of education
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado
2025, section 12 of chapter 372, (SB 25-214), amend (1)(b) as follows:
Section 12. Appropriation - adjustments to 2025 long bill.
(1) (b) The cash funds appropriation from the state education fund
created in section 17 (4)(a) of article IX of the state constitution for
school meal reimbursements is increased by $8,119,271. THE HEALTHY
SCHOOL MEALS FOR ALL PROGRAM FUND CREATED IN SECTION 22-82.9-211
(2)(a), C.R.S., FOR SCHOOL MEAL REIMBURSEMENTS IS INCREASED BY
$35,617,302.
PAGE 25-HOUSE BILL 26-1153

SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 26-HOUSE BILL 26-1153